Florida, session 2026, HB7019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 119.0712, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
119.0712 Executive branch agency-specific exemptions from
inspection or copying of public records.—
(4) DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS.—Information held by
the Department of Military Affairs that is stored in a United
States Department of Defense system of records, transmitted
using a United States Department of Defense network or
communications device, or pertaining to the United States
Department of Defense, pursuant to 10 U.S.C. s. 394, is exempt
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7019-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7019 2026
from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution. Any information not made exempt by this subsection
may be disclosed only after the department makes any redactions
in accordance with applicable federal and state laws. This
exemption applies to information made exempt by this subsection
which is held by the department before, on, or after the
effective date of the exemption. This subsection is subject to
the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s.
119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless
reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7019-00